Washington statutes.
RCW 13.36.010

Finding—Intent.

The legislature finds that a guardianship is an appropriate permanent plan for a child who has been found to be dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW and who cannot safely be reunified with his or her parents. The legislature is concerned that parents not be pressured by the department into agreeing to the entry of a guardianship when further services would increase the chances that the child could be reunified with his or her parents. The legislature intends to create a separate guardianship chapter to establish permanency for children in foster care through the appointment of a guardian and dismissal of the dependency.

[ 2010 c 272 s 1.]